Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.301

Disposition of known claims—Definition.

(1) A dissolved limited liability company that has filed a certificate of dissolution with the secretary of state may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A dissolved limited liability company may notify its known claimants of the dissolution in a record. The notice must:

(a) Specify the information required to be included in a known claim;

(b) Provide a mailing address to which the known claim must be sent;

(c) State the deadline for receipt of the known claim, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty days after the date the notice is received by the claimant; and

(d) State that the known claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(3) A known claim against a dissolved limited liability company is barred if the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are met and:

(a) The known claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

(b) In the case of a known claim that is timely received but rejected by the dissolved limited liability company, the claimant does not commence an action to enforce the known claim against the limited liability company within ninety days after the receipt of the notice of rejection.

(4) For purposes of this section, "known claim" means any claim or liability that either:

(a)(i) Has matured sufficiently, before or after the effective date of the dissolution, to be legally capable of assertion against the dissolved limited liability company, whether or not the amount of the claim or liability is known or determinable; or (ii) is unmatured, conditional, or otherwise contingent but may subsequently arise under any executory contract to which the dissolved limited liability company is a party, other than under an implied or statutory warranty as to any product manufactured, sold, distributed, or handled by the dissolved limited liability company; and

(b) As to which the dissolved limited liability company has knowledge of the identity and the mailing address of the holder of the claim or liability and, in the case of a matured and legally assertable claim or liability, actual knowledge of existing facts that either (i) could be asserted to give rise to, or (ii) indicate an intention by the holder to assert, such a matured claim or liability.

[ 2015 c 188 s 59.]